Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-409
Registrant; disciplinary action; grounds; procedure.

(1) A registration pursuant to section 28-408 to prescribe, administer, manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance may be denied, suspended, revoked, or renewal refused by the department upon a finding that the applicant or registrant:

(a) Has falsified any application filed pursuant to the Uniform Controlled Substances Act or required by the act;

(b) Has been convicted of a felony subsequent to being granted a registration pursuant to section 28-408 under any law of the United States or of any state or has been convicted of a violation relating to any substance defined in the act as a controlled substance subsequent to being granted a registration pursuant to section 28-408 under any law of the United States or of any state;

(c) Has had his or her federal registration suspended or revoked by competent federal authority and is no longer authorized by federal law to engage in the prescribing, manufacturing, distribution, or dispensing of controlled substances;

(d) Is guilty of any of the acts or offenses listed in section 38-178 for which disciplinary measures may be taken against his or her license, certificate, or registration to practice and which have a rational connection with his or her fitness to prescribe, administer, or dispense a controlled substance. The department may automatically revoke or suspend the registration of a practitioner who has had his or her license, certificate, or registration to practice revoked or suspended and is no longer authorized to prescribe, administer, or dispense under the laws of this state or who has had his or her license, certificate, or registration to practice limited or restricted and is no longer authorized to prescribe, administer, or dispense controlled substances under the laws of this state;

(e) Is habitually intoxicated or is dependent upon or actively addicted to alcohol or any controlled substance or narcotic drug; or

(f) Has violated the Uniform Controlled Substances Act or any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act.

(2) The department may limit revocation or suspension of a registration to the particular controlled substance with respect to which grounds for revocation or suspension exist.

(3) A person whose registration or renewal has been denied, revoked, or suspended shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. Such proceedings shall be independent of, and not in lieu of, criminal prosecutions or other proceedings under the Uniform Controlled Substances Act or any law of the state, except that such proceedings may be consolidated with proceedings under the Uniform Credentialing Act. Proceedings to refuse renewal of registration shall not abate the existing registration which shall remain in effect pending the outcome of the administrative hearing, except in cases when the department finds that there is an imminent danger to the public health or safety.

(4) The department may suspend any registration simultaneously with the institution of proceedings under this section or when renewal of registration is refused in cases when the department finds that there is an imminent danger to the public health or safety. Such suspension shall continue in effect until the conclusion of such proceedings, including judicial review thereof, unless sooner withdrawn by the department or dissolved by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(5) In the event the department suspends or revokes a registration granted under section 28-408, all controlled substances owned or possessed by the registrant pursuant to such registration at the time of suspension or the effective date of the revocation order, as the case may be, may in the discretion of the department be placed under seal. No disposition may be made of substances under seal until the time for taking an appeal has elapsed or until all appeals have been concluded unless a court, upon application therefor, orders the sale of perishable substances and the deposit of the proceeds of the sale with the court. Upon a revocation order becoming final, all such controlled substances may be forfeited to the state.

(6) The administration shall be promptly notified of all orders limiting, suspending, or revoking registration.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 69;

Laws 1985, LB 323, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 456, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1121.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.